Illinois, session 104th, SB1241.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by changing 5Section 130-10 as follows: 6    (60 ILCS 1/130-10)7    Sec. 130-10. Cemetery board of managers; appointment; 8powers; organization. 9    (a) If a township owns or controls a cemetery lying within 10or without, or partly within and partly without, the territory 11of the township, the township collector or, if the township 12has no township collector, the township supervisor may appoint 13a board of 3 persons who shall be known as the cemetery board 14of managers. Board members shall hold their office for a 15period of 2 years or until their successors are appointed.16    (b) The cemetery board of managers may receive in trust, 17from the proprietors or owners of any lot in the cemetery or 18any person interested in the maintenance of a lot, any gift or 19legacy of money or real, personal, or mixed property having a 20value of $50 or more that may be donated to the board of 21managers for the use and maintenance of the lot or cemetery. 22The board of managers may convert the property into money, 23invest the money as provided by motion of the township, and   SB1241 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 02961 JDS 12977 b1apply the income perpetually for the care of the cemetery lot 2or the care and maintenance of the cemetery, as specified in 3the gift or bequest and as provided by motion of the township. 4Every gift or legacy for any purpose mentioned in this Section 5made to a cemetery by its name, if the cemetery has a board of 6managers appointed under this Section, shall vest in the board 7of managers and take effect to all intents and purposes as if 8made to that board. The gift or legacy shall not fail merely 9because the cemetery is not incorporated.10    (c) The board of managers, as soon as may be convenient 11after their appointment, shall meet and organize by selecting 12one of their number to be president and another of their number 13to be clerk of the board. The board also shall select a 14treasurer of the board, who may or may not be one of their 15number and who, before entering upon the treasurer's duties, 16shall execute a bond to the People of the State of Illinois for 17the use of the board of managers in a penal sum not less than 18double the value of the money or property coming into his or 19her possession as treasurer, conditioned for the faithful 20performance of his or her duties and for the faithful 21accounting for all property that, by virtue of the office, 22comes into the treasurer's possession. The bond shall be in a 23form and with sureties approved by the township collector or, 24if the township has no township collector, the township 25supervisor and shall be approved and preserved in the same 26manner, as near as may be practicable, as is the bond of the   SB1241 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 02961 JDS 12977 b1treasurer of a village.2(Source: P.A. 84-549; 88-62.)